Utah statutes.
9-9-404.   Illegal trafficking.

(1)  Any person who knowingly sells, purchases, uses for profit, or transports for sale or profit the remains of a Native American without the right of possession to those remains as provided in this part is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.  In the case of a second or subsequent violation the person is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  Any person who knowingly sells, purchases, exchanges, receives, uses for profit, or transports for sale or profit any Native American remains obtained in violation of this part is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.  In the case of a second or subsequent violation the person is guilty of a third degree felony.

